Massachusetts, session 194th, S3000.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Division of Occupational Licensure is hereby authorized and directed to conduct a
comprehensive study into registration exemptions for professional development programming
offered by private occupational schools including but not limited to determining cost and hourly
exemption thresholds. In carrying out the provisions of this act, the Division shall consult
stakeholders, including but not limited to private educational organizations who offer
professional development programming in Massachusetts.
The Division of Occupational Licensure shall file the results of said study, together with
any recommendations for regulatory or legislative actions, with the clerks of the House and
Senate not later than 12 months following the passage of this act.
of 1